Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1110.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 51 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 100MILITARY SEXUAL TRAUMA AWARENESSSec.10001. Definitions.10002. Military sexual trauma awareness campaign.10003. Evaluation and report.§ 10001. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Campaign." The military sexual trauma awareness campaign described under section 10002 (relating to military sexual trauma awareness campaign)."Military sexual trauma." The experience of sexual assault or harassment during military service."Post-traumatic stress injury." As defined in 35 Pa.C.S. § 75A01 (relating to definitions).§ 10002. Military sexual trauma awareness campaign.(a) Implementation.--No later than 180 days after the effective date of this subsection, the department shall implement a campaign to increase public understanding of military sexual trauma to:(1) Promote awareness of the issue of military sexual trauma and acceptance for survivors.(2) Encourage active military members who have experienced military sexual trauma to officially report any occurrence of military sexual trauma.(3) Provide information about military sexual trauma support resources that are available to active military members and veterans.(b) Consultation.--To administer the campaign and ensure that the messages of the campaign are effectively tailored, the department shall consult with the following:(1) Advocacy groups focused on promoting awareness of military sexual trauma.(2) Crisis counselors and other mental health professionals specializing in military sexual trauma or post-traumatic stress injuries.(3) Veterans with lived experiences of military sexual trauma.20250HB1110PN1178 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (c) Materials and resources.--(1) To administer the campaign, the department:(i) Shall utilize a variety of materials and support resources, including print media, social media graphics, posters and displays, which shall be:(A) Posted on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(B) Designed to be mobile-friendly.(C) Available in multiple languages, as deemed necessary by the department.(D) Designed to ensure effective communication with the diverse populations and cultures across this Commonwealth.(ii) May utilize existing materials and resources, including military sexual trauma-related materials and resources developed by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs.(2) All materials and resources that are produced by the department for the campaign must comply with the act of December 20, 2015 (P.L.497, No.90), known as the Taxpayer-Funded Advertising Transparency Act.§ 10003. Evaluation and report.(a) Initial report.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall submit a report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall ensure that the report includes, at a minimum, the following:20250HB1110PN1178 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A comprehensive review of the department's efforts to raise awareness of military sexual trauma and support resources, detailing activities, key metrics utilized and budget allocations and expenditures.(2) Insights or recommendations from the consultations specified under section 10002(b) (relating to military sexual trauma awareness campaign).(3) A summary of ongoing or planned initiatives to further promote awareness of military sexual trauma and support resources developed or used to support individuals with military sexual trauma.(b) Updated report.--Within one year of the submission of the report under subsection (a), the department shall submit an updated report to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Veterans Affairs and Emergency Preparedness Committee of the House of Representatives. The department shall ensure that the updated report includes the following:(1) Information on new campaigns or initiatives to raise awareness of military sexual trauma and support resources.(2) The impact of the new campaigns or initiatives under paragraph (1) on the utilization of in-State military sexual trauma support resources.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1110PN1178 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425